Washington statutes.
RCW 4.60.040

Confession, how made.

The confession and assent thereto shall be in writing and subscribed by the parties making the same, and acknowledged by each before some officer authorized to take acknowledgments of deeds.

[Code 1881 s 294; 1877 p 60 s 298; 1869 p 72 s 296; RRS s 416.]